test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-sibama88_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sibama: # Verb (88+65Older) sibama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sibama+V+Inf/mA: [sibama, sibahama]
     sibama+V+Inf: [sipaq, sibadaq]
     sibama+V+Act+PrfPrc: sibanuq
     sibama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [sibat, sibatu]

     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [sipa, sibaha]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [sipat, sibahat, sipadõq, sibahadõq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [sipa, sipas, sibahas]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [sipamiq, sibahamiq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [sipatiq, sibahatiq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [sipasõq, sibahasõq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sibasi
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [sibasit, sibasiq, sibasidõq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sibasi
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sibasimiq
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sibasitiq
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [sibasiq, sibasivaq]
     sibama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: [sipa, sibaha]

     sibama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sibatas

     sibama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [sipav, sibahav]

     sibama+V+Jus: sibaguq
